Indiana, session 2026, HB1099.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-15.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 15.3. Prohibition on Technology Contracts with
Certain Foreign Owned Companies
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agent of a foreign adversary"
means a person:
(1) who either:
(A) is an agent, representative, employee, or servant; or
(B) acts in any capacity at the order, request, or under the
direction or control;
of the government of a foreign adversary; and
(2) whose activities are directly or indirectly financed in whole
or in part by the government of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "business entity" means:
(1) a corporation, professional corporation, nonprofit
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or limited
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


partnership; or
(2) the equivalent of any entity described in subdivision (1).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "controlling person" means:
(1) a beneficial owner (as defined in IC 23-1-20-3.5) of at least
fifty-one percent (51%) of the shares of a business entity;
(2) an officer, director, or other individual who possesses
inside information about a business entity because of the
officer, director, or other individual's relationship with the
business entity; or
(3) a person, individually or as a member of a group, who has
the ability to directly or indirectly affect a business entity's
management or policies.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "foreign adversary" includes the
following:
(1) The People's Republic of China.
(2) Iran.
(3) North Korea.
(4) Russia.
(5) A foreign government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(6) A country designated as a threat to critical infrastructure
by the governor under IC 1-1-16-8.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "prohibited person" includes
the following:
(1) A business entity organized under the laws of a foreign
adversary.
(2) A business entity headquartered in a foreign adversary.
(3) A business entity with a controlling person that is one (1)
of the following:
(A) An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary.
(B) An individual who is domiciled in a foreign adversary.
(C) A business entity or other entity, including a
governmental entity, that is owned or controlled by an
individual who is a citizen of or domiciled in a foreign
adversary, or is directly controlled by the government of
a foreign adversary.
The term, as used in subdivision (3)(A) and (3)(B), does not include
an individual who holds dual citizenship with a foreign adversary
(as defined in 15 CFR 791.4) and the United States, an individual
who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States,
or an individual who has been granted asylum in the United States.
(b) The term includes an agent, trustee, or fiduciary acting on
behalf of a prohibited person.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "qualified entity" means any of
the following:
(1) The state.
(2) A state agency (as defined in IC 1-1-15-3).
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13).
Sec. 7. (a) As used in this chapter, "technological product or
service" means a product or service used for information systems,
surveillance, light detection and ranging, or artificial intelligence.
(b) The term does not include an unmanned aerial system.
Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a new contract entered into after June 30, 2026; and
(2) an existing contract amended or renewed after June 30,
2027;
by a qualified entity for the provision of a technological product or
service.
(b) A contract to which this section applies must contain:
(1) a provision requiring the contractor to confirm under the
penalties of perjury that the contractor and any
subcontractors working under the contractor for the contract
are not prohibited persons; or
(2) if the contractor or a subcontractor working under the
contractor for the contract is a prohibited person, a provision
requiring the contractor to confirm that the contractor and
any subcontractors working on the contract are not acting as
agents of a foreign adversary.
(c) A breach of the provision under subsection (b) may be
regarded as a material breach of the contract.
SECTION 2. IC 21-49-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 7. Admission and Enrollment of Certain Foreign
Students in Qualifying Programs
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a foreign student who is
admitted to or enrolled in a qualifying program at a state
educational institution as of August 14, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "agent of a foreign adversary"
means a person:
(1) who either:
(A) is an agent, representative, employee, or servant; or
(B) acts in any capacity at the order, request, or under the
direction or control;
of the government of a foreign adversary; and
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(2) whose activities are directly or indirectly financed in whole
or in part by the government of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "approved postsecondary
educational institution" has the meaning set forth in IC 21-7-13-6.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "foreign adversary" includes the
following:
(1) The People's Republic of China.
(2) Iran.
(3) North Korea.
(4) Russia.
(5) A foreign government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(6) A country designated as a threat to critical infrastructure
by the governor under IC 1-1-16-8.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "foreign student" means an
individual who is:
(1) a citizen of a foreign adversary; and
(2) not a United States citizen or an alien who is admitted into
the United States for lawful, permanent residence or has been
granted asylum in the United States.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "qualifying program" refers to
one (1) of the following fields of study at the undergraduate,
graduate, doctoral, or postdoctoral level:
(1) Chemical engineering.
(2) Electrical engineering.
(3) Industrial engineering.
(4) Mechanical engineering.
(5) Artificial intelligence.
(6) Computer science.
(7) Microbiology.
(8) Virology.
(9) A field of study designated by the commissioner for higher
education under section 11 of this chapter.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "state educational institution"
has the definition set forth in IC 21-7-13-32.
Sec. 8. (a) Beginning August 15, 2026, a state educational
institution may not admit a foreign student into a qualifying
program until the state educational institution has completed a
foreign influence and research security review for the foreign
student.
(b) A foreign influence and research security review required
under subsection (a) must include, at a minimum, a review of the
following information concerning the foreign student:
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(1) All current and past affiliations, paid or unpaid, including
academic, research, government, and commercial affiliations.
(2) All outside support related to the foreign student's
education, training, or research activities, including foreign
funding sources such as tuition aid, travel aid, complimentary
travel, scholarships, or stipends.
(3) Any agreements, including intellectual property
agreements, employment agreements, consulting agreements,
or other obligations that relate to the foreign student's
research, education, or training.
(4) Any planned external collaboration, supervision, or
research reporting relationship or requirement with a person
outside of the state educational institution.
(5) Whether the foreign student or the foreign student's
parent, sibling, spouse, grandparent, aunt, or uncle, including
those related by blood or marriage, are any of the following:
(A) An employee of the government of a foreign adversary.
(B) A member of a political party of a foreign adversary.
(C) A member of a united front organization or a similar
association or organization that is sponsored or supported
by the government of a foreign adversary and exists to
encourage support of the government of the foreign
adversary.
(6) Whether the foreign student was previously employed by
the government of a foreign adversary or served in the
military or security services for the government of a foreign
adversary.
(7) Whether the foreign student has any ties to a malign
foreign talent recruitment program or another foreign talent
recruitment program sponsored by, affiliated with, or based
in a foreign adversary that requires the foreign student to
engage in activities that violate the foreign student's
obligations to the state of Indiana, the United States, or to the
state educational institution.
(c) If a state educational institution obtains information while
conducting a foreign influence and security review on a foreign
student that indicates the foreign student is an agent of a foreign
adversary, the state educational institution may not enroll the
foreign student.
(d) A state educational institution may not admit a foreign
student who refuses or fails to provide the state educational
institution with any information necessary to complete a foreign
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


influence and research security review under this section.
Sec. 9. (a) A foreign student who is admitted into a state
educational institution after a foreign influence and research
security review is completed under section 8 of this chapter must
sign an attestation stating that the foreign student has not accepted
and will not accept any direct or indirect financial support or
funding from a foreign adversary before the state educational
institution may enroll the foreign student in the qualifying
program.
(b) If a state educational institution obtains information that a
foreign student has accepted direct or indirect financial support or
funding from a foreign adversary, the state educational institution
must immediately unenroll the foreign student.
Sec. 10. A foreign student who is enrolled in a qualifying
program at a state educational institution must immediately
disclose the following to the state educational institution:
(1) Any changes to the information regarding the foreign
student provided in section 8(b)(5), 8(b)(6), and 8(b)(7) of this
chapter.
(2) Any contact with an agent of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 11. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the commissioner for
higher education may designate a field of study as a qualifying
program.
(b) The commissioner for higher education must provide the
board of trustees of each state educational institution and approved
postsecondary educational institution with notice of the designation
of a field of study as a qualifying program under subsection (a) not
later than six (6) months prior to the start of the next academic
term.
Sec. 12. (a) Not later than November 1, 2026, an approved
postsecondary educational institution shall provide to the
commission for higher education the following information:
(1) The number of foreign students enrolled in a qualifying
program at the approved postsecondary educational
institution as of August 15, 2026.
(2) The number of foreign students enrolled in a qualifying
program at the approved postsecondary educational
institution for each academic year for the preceding ten (10)
years.
(b) This section expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. IC 32-22-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Rights of a Foreign Business Entity to Hold and Convey
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


Agricultural Land).
SECTION 4. IC 32-22-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.5. Prohibition on Ownership of Land by Certain
Foreign Owned Companies and Foreign Individuals
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "acting as an agent of a
foreign adversary" means to knowingly engage in conduct at the
direction of or under the control of a foreign adversary that
materially advances the foreign adversary's strategic, intelligence,
or military objectives.
(b) The term does not include the ownership or operation of a
business entity that engages solely in ordinary commercial
activities for profit and that is not subject to the direction, control,
or material influence of the foreign adversary with respect to the
conduct at issue.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "agent of a foreign adversary"
means a person:
(1) who either:
(A) is an agent, representative, employee, or servant; or
(B) acts in any capacity at the order, request, or under the
direction or control;
of the government of a foreign adversary; and
(2) whose activities are directly or indirectly financed in whole
or in part by the government of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "business entity" means:
(1) a corporation, professional corporation, nonprofit
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or limited
partnership; or
(2) the equivalent of any entity described in subdivision (1).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "controlling person" means:
(1) a beneficial owner (as defined in IC 23-1-20-3.5) of at least
fifty-one percent (51%) of the shares of a business entity;
(2) an officer, director, or other individual who possesses
inside information about a business entity because of the
officer, director, or other individual's relationship with the
business entity; or
(3) a person, individually or as a member of a group, who has
the ability to directly or indirectly affect a business entity's
management or policies.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "foreign adversary" includes the
following:
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(1) The People's Republic of China.
(2) Iran.
(3) North Korea.
(4) Russia.
(5) A foreign government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(6) A country designated as a threat to critical infrastructure
by the governor under IC 1-1-16-8.
Sec. 6. (a) As used in this chapter, "prohibited person" includes
the following:
(1) An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary.
(2) An individual who is domiciled in a foreign adversary.
(3) A business entity organized under the laws of a foreign
adversary.
(4) A business entity headquartered in a foreign adversary.
(5) A business entity with a controlling person that is one (1)
of the following:
(A) An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary.
(B) An individual who is domiciled in a foreign adversary.
(C) A business entity or other entity, including a
governmental entity, that is owned or controlled by an
individual described in subdivision (1) or (2), or is directly
controlled by the government of a foreign adversary.
The term, as used in subdivisions (1), (2), (5)(A), and (5)(B), does
not include an individual who holds dual citizenship with a foreign
adversary and the United States, an individual who is a citizen or
lawful permanent resident of the United States, or an individual
who has been granted asylum in the United States.
(b) The term includes an agent, trustee, or fiduciary acting on
behalf of a prohibited person.
Sec. 7. After June 30, 2026, a prohibited person may not do any
of the following:
(1) Acquire by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise
any real property located in Indiana.
(2) Acquire by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise
any mineral right or water or riparian right on any real
property located in Indiana.
(3) Enter into a new lease agreement as a lessee for any real
property located in Indiana. This subdivision does not apply
to a lease agreement to which the following apply:
(A) The real property that is the subject of the lease
agreement will be used only for residential purposes.
(B) The lease agreement is for a term of not more than
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


twenty-four (24) months.
(4) Enter into a new lease agreement for any mineral right or
riparian right on any real property located in Indiana.
Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to a prohibited person that owns
an interest in real property located in Indiana on July 1, 2026.
(b) A prohibited person that owns an interest in real property
located in Indiana on July 1, 2026, shall not act as an agent of a
foreign adversary.
(c) The attorney general may bring an action under section 9 of
this chapter to require divestiture of a prohibited person's real
property interest only if the attorney general establishes, by clear
and convincing evidence, that the prohibited person is acting as an
agent of a foreign adversary.
(d) If the attorney general makes a prima facie showing under
subsection (c), the burden of proof shifts to the prohibited person
to demonstrate, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
ownership or control of the real property does not present a risk of
the prohibited person acting as an agent of a foreign adversary.
(e) A court may not order divestiture under section 9 of this
chapter unless the court enters written findings of fact and
conclusions of law establishing that the attorney general has
satisfied the burden required under subsection (c) and that
divestiture is permitted under this section.
Sec. 9. (a) Upon receipt of information that leads the attorney
general to believe a prohibited person has violated section 7 or 8 of
this chapter, the attorney general shall investigate the alleged
violation and may issue subpoenas requiring the:
(1) appearance of witnesses;
(2) production of relevant records; and
(3) giving of relevant testimony.
(b) The attorney general shall enforce a violation of section 7 or
8 of this chapter by commencing a receivership proceeding under
IC 32-30-5-1 and selling the real property or the interest in real
property through the receivership. The following apply to a
receivership proceeding under this section:
(1) Proceeds of the sale shall be paid as follows:
(A) To lienholders, in their order of priority, except for
liens which under the terms of the sale are to remain on the
property.
(B) The costs of the receivership and sale, including
reasonable attorney's fees and expert fees.
(C) No proceeds shall be distributed from the receivership
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


sale to the prohibited person. Any excess proceeds are
forfeited and shall be transferred to the state general fund
by the receiver.
(2) If a receivership proceeding is initiated under this section,
the prohibited person is personally liable for a civil penalty in
the amount of ten percent (10%) of the market value of the
real property, payable to the state general fund.
(3) At the receivership sale, lienholders shall be able to have
a credit bid in an amount that is not more than the amount
owed to the lienholder on the date of the sale, as established in
the court order for the sale of the property.
(4) Upon commencement of an action under this section, the
attorney general shall promptly file a notice of lis pendens
with the clerk of court. Upon the entry of an order for the sale
of the real property under this section, the attorney general
shall promptly record a copy of the order in the office of the
recorder of the county where the property is located.
(c) Notwithstanding section 10 of this chapter, the responsibility
for determining whether an individual or other entity is subject to
section 7 or 8 of this chapter rests solely with the prohibited person
and the attorney general and no other individual or entity. An
individual or other entity who is not a prohibited person shall bear
no civil or criminal liability for failing to determine or make
inquiry of whether an individual or other entity is a prohibited
person.
(d) Except for an interest created after the effective date of the
lis pendens notice filed under subsection (b)(4), divestiture of a
prohibited person's title under this section shall not be a basis to
void, invalidate, or otherwise extinguish any bona fide mortgage,
lien, or other interest granted by, through, or under the prohibited
person. An interest created after the effective date of the lis
pendens notice filed under subsection (b)(4) is void upon entry of
an order for the sale of the real property under this section.
Sec. 10. (a) As used in this section, "reporting person" means a
person in the business of providing real estate closing and
settlement services in Indiana that is:
(1) listed as the closing or settlement agent on the closing or
settlement statement for a real estate transfer;
(2) if no person described in subdivision (1) is involved in a
transfer of real property, the person that prepares the closing
or settlement statement for the transfer;
(3) if no person described in subdivisions (1) or (2) is involved
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


in a transfer of real property, the person that files with the
recorder's office the deed or other instrument that transfers
ownership of the real property;
(4) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (3) is
involved in a transfer of real property, the person that
underwrites an owner's title insurance policy for the
transferee with respect to the transferred real property, such
as a title insurance company;
(5) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (4) is
involved in a transfer of real property, the person that
disburses in any form, including from an escrow account or
trust account, the greatest amount of funds in connection with
the transfer of the real property;
(6) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (5) is
involved in a transfer of real property, the person that
provides an evaluation of the status of the title; or
(7) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (6) is
involved in a transfer of real property, then the person that
prepares the deed or, if no deed is involved, any other legal
instrument that transfers ownership of the real property.
If the reporting person is an employee, agent, or partner acting
within the scope of the individual's employment, agency, or
partnership, the individual's employer, principal, or partnership
is the reporting person.
(b) If a reporting person participates in a transfer of real
property that violates this chapter, the reporting person shall file
a report with the attorney general in the form and manner
prescribed by the attorney general.
(c) Upon receipt of information that leads the attorney general
to believe that a reporting person failed to file a report as required
under this section or intentionally provided inaccurate information
in a report filed under this section, the attorney general may
investigate the alleged violation and issue subpoenas requiring the:
(1) appearance of witnesses;
(2) production of relevant records; and
(3) giving of relevant testimony.
(d) If a reporting person knowingly or intentionally fails to
comply with subsection (b), the attorney general may impose a civil
penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. A civil
penalty collected under this section shall be deposited in the state
general fund.
SECTION 5. IC 34-30-2.1-525.4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 525.4. IC 32-22-3-4.5(c) (Concerning agricultural
land purchased or leased by a prohibited person).
SECTION 6. IC 34-30-2.1-525.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 525.5. IC 32-22-3-6.5(c) (Concerning agricultural
land held by a prohibited person).
SECTION 7. IC 34-30-2.1-525.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 525.6. IC 32-22-3.5-9 (Concerning
land held by a prohibited person).
SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Judiciary, to which was referred
House Bill 1099, has had the same under consideration and begs leave
to report the same back to the House with the recommendation that said
bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, between lines 5 and 6, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agent of a foreign adversary"
means a person:
(1) who either:
(A) is an agent, representative, employee, or servant; or
(B) acts in any capacity at the order, request, or under the
direction or control;
of the government of a foreign adversary; and
(2) whose activities are directly or indirectly financed in whole
or in part by the government of a foreign adversary.".
Page 1, line 6, delete "1." and insert "2.".
Page 1, line 11, delete "2." and insert "3.".
Page 2, line 4, delete "3." and insert "4.".
Page 2, line 13, delete "4." and insert "5.".
Page 2, line 34, delete "5." and insert "6.".
Page 2, line 39, delete "6." and insert "7.".
Page 3, delete lines 1 through 10, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a new contract entered into after June 30, 2026; and
(2) an existing contract amended or renewed after June 30,
2027;
by a qualified entity for the provision of a technological product or
service.
(b) A contract to which this section applies must contain:
(1) a provision requiring the contractor to confirm under the
penalties of perjury that the contractor and any
subcontractors working under the contractor for the contract
are not prohibited persons; or
(2) if the contractor or a subcontractor working under the
contractor for the contract is a prohibited person, a provision
requiring the contractor to confirm that the contractor and
any subcontractors working on the contract are not acting as
agents of a foreign adversary.
(c) A breach of the provision under subsection (b) may be
regarded as a material breach of the contract.".
Page 3, delete lines 11 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


"SECTION 2. IC 21-49-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 7. Admission and Enrollment of Certain Foreign
Students in Qualifying Programs
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a foreign student who is
admitted to or enrolled in a qualifying program at a state
educational institution as of August 14, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "agent of a foreign adversary"
means a person:
(1) who either:
(A) is an agent, representative, employee, or servant; or
(B) acts in any capacity at the order, request, or under the
direction or control;
of the government of a foreign adversary; and
(2) whose activities are directly or indirectly financed in whole
or in part by the government of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "foreign adversary" includes the
following:
(1) The People's Republic of China.
(2) Iran.
(3) North Korea.
(4) Russia.
(5) A foreign government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(6) A country designated as a threat to critical infrastructure
by the governor under IC 1-1-16-8.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "foreign student" means an
individual who is:
(1) a citizen of a foreign adversary; and
(2) not a United States citizen or an alien who is admitted into
the United States for lawful, permanent residence or has been
granted asylum in the United States.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "qualifying program" refers to
one (1) of the following fields of study at the undergraduate,
graduate, doctoral, or postdoctoral level:
(1) Chemical engineering.
(2) Electrical engineering.
(3) Industrial engineering.
(4) Mechanical engineering.
(5) Artificial intelligence.
(6) Computer science.
(7) Microbiology.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(8) Virology.
(9) A field of study designated by the commissioner for higher
education under section 10 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "state educational institution"
has the definition set forth in IC 21-7-13-32.
Sec. 7. (a) Beginning August 15, 2026, a state educational
institution may not admit a foreign student into a qualifying
program until the state educational institution has completed a
foreign influence and research security review for the foreign
student.
(b) A foreign influence and research security review required
under subsection (a) must include, at a minimum, a review of the
following information concerning the foreign student:
(1) All current and past affiliations, paid or unpaid, including
academic, research, government, and commercial affiliations.
(2) All outside support related to the foreign student's
education, training, or research activities, including foreign
funding sources such as tuition aid, travel aid, complimentary
travel, scholarships, or stipends.
(3) Any agreements, including intellectual property
agreements, employment agreements, consulting agreements,
or other obligations that relate to the foreign student's
research, education, or training.
(4) Any planned external collaboration, supervision, or
research reporting relationship or requirement with a person
outside of the state educational institution.
(5) Whether the foreign student or the foreign student's
parent, sibling, spouse, grandparent, aunt, or uncle, including
those related by blood or marriage, are any of the following:
(A) An employee of the government of a foreign adversary.
(B) A member of a political party of a foreign adversary.
(C) A member of a united front organization or a similar
association or organization that is sponsored or supported
by the government of a foreign adversary and exists to
encourage support of the government of the foreign
adversary.
(6) Whether the foreign student was previously employed by
the government of a foreign adversary or served in the
military or security services for the government of a foreign
adversary.
(7) Whether the foreign student has any ties to a malign
foreign talent recruitment program or another foreign talent
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


recruitment program sponsored by, affiliated with, or based
in a foreign adversary that requires the foreign student to
engage in activities that violate the foreign student's
obligations to the state of Indiana, the United States, or to the
state educational institution.
(c) If a state educational institution obtains information while
conducting a foreign influence and security review on a foreign
student that indicates the foreign student is an agent of a foreign
adversary, the state educational institution may not enroll the
foreign student.
(d) A state educational institution may not admit a foreign
student who refuses or fails to provide the state educational
institution with any information necessary to complete a foreign
influence and research security review under this section.
Sec. 8. (a) A foreign student who is admitted into a state
educational institution after a foreign influence and research
security review is completed under section 7 of this chapter must
sign an attestation stating that the foreign student has not accepted
and will not accept any direct or indirect financial support or
funding from a foreign adversary before the state educational
institution may enroll the foreign student in the qualifying
program.
(b) If a state educational institution obtains information that a
foreign student has accepted direct or indirect financial support or
funding from a foreign adversary, the state educational institution
must immediately unenroll the foreign student.
Sec. 9. A foreign student who is enrolled in a qualifying program
at a state educational institution must immediately disclose the
following to the state educational institution:
(1) Any changes to the information regarding the foreign
student provided in section 7(b)(5), 7(b)(6), and 7(b)(7) of this
chapter.
(2) Any contact with an agent of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 10. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the commissioner for
higher education may designate a field of study as a qualifying
program.
(b) The commissioner for higher education must provide the
board of trustees of each state educational institution with notice
of the designation of a field of study as a qualifying program under
subsection (a) not later than six (6) months prior to the start of the
next academic term.".
Page 4, delete lines 1 through 21.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


Page 4, delete lines 25 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 4. IC 32-22-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.5. Prohibition on Ownership of Land by Certain
Foreign Owned Companies and Foreign Individuals
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "acting as an agent of a
foreign adversary" means to knowingly engage in conduct at the
direction of or under the control of a foreign adversary that
materially advances the foreign adversary's strategic, intelligence,
or military objectives.
(b) The term does not include the ownership or operation of a
business entity that engages solely in ordinary commercial
activities for profit and that is not subject to the direction, control,
or material influence of the foreign adversary with respect to the
conduct at issue.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "agent of a foreign adversary"
means a person:
(1) who either:
(A) is an agent, representative, employee, or servant; or
(B) acts in any capacity at the order, request, or under the
direction or control;
of the government of a foreign adversary; and
(2) whose activities are directly or indirectly financed in whole
or in part by the government of a foreign adversary.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "business entity" means:
(1) a corporation, professional corporation, nonprofit
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or limited
partnership; or
(2) the equivalent of any entity described in subdivision (1).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "controlling person" means:
(1) a beneficial owner (as defined in IC 23-1-20-3.5) of at least
fifty-one percent (51%) of the shares of a business entity;
(2) an officer, director, or other individual who possesses
inside information about a business entity because of the
officer, director, or other individual's relationship with the
business entity; or
(3) a person, individually or as a member of a group, who has
the ability to directly or indirectly affect a business entity's
management or policies.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "foreign adversary" includes the
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


following:
(1) The People's Republic of China.
(2) Iran.
(3) North Korea.
(4) Russia.
(5) A foreign government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(6) A country designated as a threat to critical infrastructure
by the governor under IC 1-1-16-8.
Sec. 6. (a) As used in this chapter, "prohibited person" includes
the following:
(1) An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary.
(2) An individual who is domiciled in a foreign adversary.
(3) A business entity organized under the laws of a foreign
adversary.
(4) A business entity headquartered in a foreign adversary.
(5) A business entity with a controlling person that is one (1)
of the following:
(A) An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary.
(B) An individual who is domiciled in a foreign adversary.
(C) A business entity or other entity, including a
governmental entity, that is owned or controlled by an
individual described in subdivision (1) or (2), or is directly
controlled by the government of a foreign adversary.
The term, as used in subdivisions (1), (2), (5)(A), and (5)(B), does
not include an individual who holds dual citizenship with a foreign
adversary and the United States, an individual who is a citizen or
lawful permanent resident of the United States, or an individual
who has been granted asylum in the United States.
(b) The term includes an agent, trustee, or fiduciary acting on
behalf of a prohibited person.
Sec. 7. After June 30, 2026, a prohibited person may not do any
of the following:
(1) Acquire by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise
any real property located in Indiana.
(2) Acquire by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise
any mineral right or water or riparian right on any real
property located in Indiana.
(3) Enter into a new lease agreement as a lessee for any real
property located in Indiana. This subdivision does not apply
to a lease agreement to which the following apply:
(A) The real property that is the subject of the lease
agreement will be used only for residential purposes.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(B) The lease agreement is for a term of not more than
twenty-four (24) months.
(4) Enter into a new lease agreement for any mineral right or
riparian right on any real property located in Indiana.
Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to a prohibited person that owns
an interest in real property located in Indiana on July 1, 2026.
(b) A prohibited person that owns an interest in real property
located in Indiana on July 1, 2026, shall not act as an agent of a
foreign adversary.
(c) The attorney general may bring an action under section 9 of
this chapter to require divestiture of a prohibited person's real
property interest only if the attorney general establishes, by clear
and convincing evidence, that the prohibited person is acting as an
agent of a foreign adversary.
(d) If the attorney general makes a prima facie showing under
subsection (c), the burden of proof shifts to the prohibited person
to demonstrate, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
ownership or control of the real property does not present a risk of
the prohibited person acting as an agent of a foreign adversary.
(e) A court may not order divestiture under section 9 of this
chapter unless the court enters written findings of fact and
conclusions of law establishing that the attorney general has
satisfied the burden required under subsection (c) and that
divestiture is permitted under this section.
Sec. 9. (a) Upon receipt of information that leads the attorney
general to believe a prohibited person has violated section 7 or 8 of
this chapter, the attorney general shall investigate the alleged
violation and may issue subpoenas requiring the:
(1) appearance of witnesses;
(2) production of relevant records; and
(3) giving of relevant testimony.
(b) The attorney general shall enforce a violation of section 7 or
of this chapter by commencing a receivership proceeding under
IC 32-30-5-1 and selling the real property or the interest in real
property through the receivership. The following apply to a
receivership proceeding under this section:
(1) Proceeds of the sale shall be paid as follows:
(A) To lienholders, in their order of priority, except for
liens which under the terms of the sale are to remain on the
property.
(B) The costs of the receivership and sale, including
reasonable attorney's fees and expert fees.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(C) No proceeds shall be distributed from the receivership
sale to the prohibited person. Any excess proceeds are
forfeited and shall be transferred to the state general fund
by the receiver.
(2) If a receivership proceeding is initiated under this section,
the prohibited person is personally liable for a civil penalty in
the amount of ten percent (10%) of the market value of the
real property, payable to the state general fund.
(3) At the receivership sale, lienholders shall be able to have
a credit bid in an amount that is not more than the amount
owed to the lienholder on the date of the sale, as established in
the court order for the sale of the property.
(4) Upon commencement of an action under this section, the
attorney general shall promptly file a notice of lis pendens
with the clerk of court. Upon the entry of an order for the sale
of the real property under this section, the attorney general
shall promptly record a copy of the order in the office of the
recorder of the county where the property is located.
(c) Notwithstanding section 10 of this chapter, the responsibility
for determining whether an individual or other entity is subject to
section 7 or 8 of this chapter rests solely with the prohibited person
and the attorney general and no other individual or entity. An
individual or other entity who is not a prohibited person shall bear
no civil or criminal liability for failing to determine or make
inquiry of whether an individual or other entity is a prohibited
person.
(d) Except for an interest created after the effective date of the
lis pendens notice filed under subsection (b)(4), divestiture of a
prohibited person's title under this section shall not be a basis to
void, invalidate, or otherwise extinguish any bona fide mortgage,
lien, or other interest granted by, through, or under the prohibited
person. An interest created after the effective date of the lis
pendens notice filed under subsection (b)(4) is void upon entry of
an order for the sale of the real property under this section.
Sec. 10. (a) As used in this section, "reporting person" means a
person in the business of providing real estate closing and
settlement services in Indiana that is:
(1) listed as the closing or settlement agent on the closing or
settlement statement for a real estate transfer;
(2) if no person described in subdivision (1) is involved in a
transfer of real property, the person that prepares the closing
or settlement statement for the transfer;
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(3) if no person described in subdivisions (1) or (2) is involved
in a transfer of real property, the person that files with the
recorder's office the deed or other instrument that transfers
ownership of the real property;
(4) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (3) is
involved in a transfer of real property, the person that
underwrites an owner's title insurance policy for the
transferee with respect to the transferred real property, such
as a title insurance company;
(5) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (4) is
involved in a transfer of real property, the person that
disburses in any form, including from an escrow account or
trust account, the greatest amount of funds in connection with
the transfer of the real property;
(6) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (5) is
involved in a transfer of real property, the person that
provides an evaluation of the status of the title; or
(7) if no person described in subdivisions (1) through (6) is
involved in a transfer of real property, then the person that
prepares the deed or, if no deed is involved, any other legal
instrument that transfers ownership of the real property.
If the reporting person is an employee, agent, or partner acting
within the scope of the individual's employment, agency, or
partnership, the individual's employer, principal, or partnership
is the reporting person.
(b) If a reporting person participates in a transfer of real
property that violates this chapter, the reporting person shall file
a report with the attorney general in the form and manner
prescribed by the attorney general.
(c) Upon receipt of information that leads the attorney general
to believe that a reporting person failed to file a report as required
under this section or intentionally provided inaccurate information
in a report filed under this section, the attorney general may
investigate the alleged violation and issue subpoenas requiring the:
(1) appearance of witnesses;
(2) production of relevant records; and
(3) giving of relevant testimony.
(d) If a reporting person knowingly or intentionally fails to
comply with subsection (b), the attorney general may impose a civil
penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. A civil
penalty collected under this section shall be deposited in the state
general fund.".
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


Delete pages 5 through 7.
Page 8, delete lines 1 through 24.
Page 8, line 33, delete "IC 32-22-3.5-7" and insert "IC 32-22-3.5-9".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1099 as introduced.)
JETER
Committee Vote: yeas 12, nays 0.
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1099 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 4, between lines 2 and 3, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "approved postsecondary
educational institution" has the meaning set forth in IC 21-7-13-6.".
Page 4, line 3, delete "Sec. 3." and insert "Sec. 4.".
Page 4, line 12, delete "Sec. 4." and insert "Sec. 5.".
Page 4, line 18, delete "Sec. 5." and insert "Sec. 6.".
Page 4, line 30, delete "10" and insert "11".
Page 4, line 31, delete "Sec. 6." and insert "Sec. 7.".
Page 4, line 33, delete "Sec. 7." and insert "Sec. 8.".
Page 5, line 42, delete "Sec. 8." and insert "Sec. 9.".
Page 6, line 2, delete "7" and insert "8".
Page 6, line 12, delete "Sec. 9." and insert "Sec. 10.".
Page 6, line 16, delete "7(b)(5), 7(b)(6), and 7(b)(7)" and insert
"8(b)(5), 8(b)(6), and 8(b)(7)".
Page 6, line 19, delete "Sec. 10." and insert "Sec. 11.".
Page 6, line 23, after "institution" insert "and approved
postsecondary educational institution".
Page 6, between lines 26 and 27, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 12. (a) Not later than November 1, 2026, an approved
postsecondary educational institution shall provide to the
commission for higher education the following information:
(1) The number of foreign students enrolled in a qualifying
program at the approved postsecondary educational
institution as of August 15, 2026.
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137


(2) The number of foreign students enrolled in a qualifying
program at the approved postsecondary educational
institution for each academic year for the preceding ten (10)
years.
(b) This section expires July 1, 2027.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1099 as printed January 27, 2026.)
COMMONS
HB 1099—LS 6496/DI 137